Washington statutes.
RCW 26.04.007

Definition—Religious organization.

For purposes of this chapter, "religious organization" includes, but is not limited to, churches, mosques, synagogues, temples, nondenominational ministries, interdenominational and ecumenical organizations, mission organizations, faith-based social agencies, and other entities whose principal purpose is the study, practice, or advancement of religion.

[ 2012 c 3 s 7 (Referendum Measure No. 74, approved November 6, 2012).]

NOTES:

Notice—2012 c 3: See note following RCW 26.04.010.